Alabama, session 2026rs, HB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Legislature voluntarily elects the
State of Alabama to participate in the federal tax credit
established under 26 U.S.C. § 25F for individuals who make
qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations.

(b) The Department of Revenue shall annually submit to
the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury and publish on the
Department of Revenue's website a list of all scholarship
granting organizations that meet the requirements under 26
U.S.C. § 25F and are located in this state. The Department of
Revenue shall certify to the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury
the Department of Revenue's authority to submit the list on
behalf of the state and comply with the requirements of 26
U.S.C. § 25F, including any applicable federal regulations or
guidance, to ensure that the state is eligible to participate
Page 1

guidance, to ensure that the state is eligible to participate
HB342 Engrossed
in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.
(c) The Department of Revenue may establish rules for
the implementation and administration of this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB342 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................29-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Fiscal Responsibility

Read for the second time and placed ................12-Feb-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................26-Feb-26
as amended
Yeas 103
Nays 0
Abstains 1


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3